Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-193
Notice; publication required; filing.

(1) Notice of organization, amendment of
the certificate of organization, merger, conversion, or domestication
must be published three successive weeks in some legal newspaper of general
circulation near the designated office of the limited liability company. A
notice of organization must show the
information required by subsection (b) of section 21-117 to be stated in the
certificate of organization. A brief resume of any amendment of the certificate of organization or of any merger,
conversion, or domestication of the limited liability company shall be published
in the same manner and for the same period of time as notice of organization
is required to be published.

(2) Whenever any limited liability company is voluntarily dissolved,
notice of the dissolution shall be published as required by section 21-150.

(3) Proof of publication of any of the notices shall be filed in the
office of the Secretary of State. In the event any notice described in subsection
(1) of this section and required to be given pursuant to this section is not
given, but is subsequently published for the required time, and proof of the
publication thereof is filed in the office of the Secretary of State, the
acts of the limited liability company prior to, as well as after, such publication
shall be valid.

Laws 2010, LB888, § 93;

Laws 2012, LB942, § 1.